ja_JP.dic
後退る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
浴びる/1KBDUyUbKN
あゆぶ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
あゆみよる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
在り/5A5I5ERU
あり/5A5I5ERU
言い暮らす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
言い消す/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
いいすくめる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
如何なり/5A5I5ERU
いかなり/5A5I5ERU
いきあたる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
いきおいこむ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
いけこむ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
いこう/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4UV2
いちづける/1KBDUyUbKN
在すがり/5A5I5ERU
いますがり/5A5I5ERU
在そがり/5A5I5ERU
いまそがり/5A5I5ERU
入込む/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
入り浸る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
うえつける/1KBDUyUbKNV2
うかがう/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
薄ぼける/1KBDUyUbKN
打ち有り/5A5I5ERU
うちあり/5A5I5ERU
打ち落とす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
打ち懸る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
うってかわる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
うつくしむ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
産まれる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
産み落す/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
生む/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
追放つ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
おいまさる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
おおいかぶせる/1KBDUyUbKN
仰せられる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
おきわすれる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
押し張る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
押し転かす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
押っ被せる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
押っ圧折る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
大人じみる/1KBDUyUbKN
思い切る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
おもいさます/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
居り/5A5I5ERU
おり/5A5I5ERU
かいうける/1KBDUyUbKNV2
かいくぐる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
買込む/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
かいしょめく/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
かいたたく/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
斯かり/5A5I5ERU
かかり/5A5I5ERU
かきたる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKNV2
書き飛ばす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
搔き分ける/1KBDUyUbKNV2
かけいる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
かけちがう/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
かすむ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKNV2
稼ぎ出す/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
忝あり/5A5I5ERU
かたじけあり/5A5I5ERU
黴る/1KBDUyUbKNv2
かもる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
絡組む/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
涸びる/1KBDUyUbKNv2
搦む/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKNV2
聞き違える/1KBDUyUbKNV2
聞き開く/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
聞く/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
汚む/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
気張る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
截る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
きれる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
極め尽くす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
下ある/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
口遊ぶ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
組み合う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
組み換える/1KBDUyUbKNV2
くみしく/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
来り/5A5I5ERU
けり/5A5I5ERU
着り/5A5I5ERU
服り/5A5I5ERU
見識ぶる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
こいる/1KBDUyUbKN
こいわたる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
こおる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
ころがる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
声作る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
こわれる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
咲遅れる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
咲き渡る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
誘い合わせる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
然り/5A5I5ERU
さり/5A5I5ERU
責る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
しかり/5A5I5ERU
しかる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
しけこむ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
しじかむ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
死に後れる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
写メる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
悄気る/1KBDUyUbKN
しりそめる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
梳き取る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
すくう/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
すみこむ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
刷り上げる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
掏り替える/1KBDUyUbKNV2
染め上げる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
染め出す/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
戦ぐ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
空めく/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
そりくりかえる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
立ち顕れる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
立ち行く/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
截つ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
たべのこす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
ためなおす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
駄駄ける/1KBDUyUbKN
散り乱れる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
熟える/1KBDUyUbKNV2
尽き果てる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
付狙う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
土降る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
努める/1KBDUyUbKN
つぶす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
つるしあげる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
通り抜ける/1KBDUyUbKN
ときこむ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
磨ぐ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
としよる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
取り決める/1KBDUyUbKNV2
とりこめる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
とりすます/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
泣き悲しむ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
なきしずむ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
なごやぐ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
なぞらえる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
名立たり/5A5I5ERU
なだたり/5A5I5ERU
にじる/1KBDUyUbKN
抜連れる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
ぬぐう/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
抜け上る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
ぬりかくす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
飲掛ける/1KBDUyUbKN
飲み付ける/1KBDUyUbKN
のめずり込む/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
禿げ上がる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
挟む/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKNV2
はにかむ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
はばむ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKNV2
侍り/5A5I5ERU
はべり/5A5I5ERU
はんべり/5A5I5ERU
ひきいる/1KBDUyUbKN
引き払う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
ひきわる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
弾く/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
瞑ぐ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
吹き抜ける/1KBDUyUbKNV2
ふくみおく/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
踏出す/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
ふみちがえる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
ふみはる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
踏ん反る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
ぶっこむ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
ほりぬく/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
舞い狂う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
まおす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
罷り在り/5A5I5ERU
まかりあり/5A5I5ERU
巻上げる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
まくしたてる/1KBDUyUbKNV2
みとる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
見計る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
坐そがり/5A5I5ERU
みまそがり/5A5I5ERU
召替える/1KBDUyUbKNV2
召し捕る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
免じる/1KBDUyUbKN
戻らかす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
揉み合う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
結い付ける/1KBDUyUbKNV2
ようがり/5A5I5ERU
よす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKNV2
よばれる/1KBDUyUbKN
よびだす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
読み熟す/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
